District of Columbia statutes.
2-1404.01

Establishment of the Commission on Human Rights.

There is hereby established, in the Executive Branch of the District government, a Commission on Human Rights.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title IV, § 401
as added Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-216, § 2(b), 51 DCR 9123
This section is referenced in § 1-523.01.